Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 4. Investment Loss Trust Fund.

Sec. 37.14.300.
Investment loss trust fund.

There is established as a separate fund in the state treasury the investment loss trust fund. The trust fund consists of money appropriated to it by the legislature. The Department of Revenue is the custodian of the trust fund and shall invest the trust fund in accordance with AS

37.10.071

. Subject to appropriation, the amount earned on money in the trust fund shall be retained in the trust fund. The trust fund shall be held in trust for the benefit of participants in the supplemental annuity plan established under AS

39.30.150

—

39.30.180

and for other purposes authorized by this section, subject to the conditions set out in this section.

The Department of Administration shall spend money from the trust fund as necessary to

hold participants in the plan and annuity holders harmless from a loss on investments in guaranteed investment and annuity contracts issued by Executive Life Insurance Company of California;

pursue a right to recover amounts from persons who may have unlawfully caused or contributed to the loss on investments; and

protect the interest of participants in the plan and annuity holders during proceedings to conserve or liquidate the assets of Executive Life Insurance Company of California.

If the plan or an annuity holder does not incur a loss on investments, or, if after compensating the plan and annuity holders for the loss on investments, a balance remains in the trust fund, the trust fund created in (a) of this section is terminated and the balance of the trust fund lapses pro rata into the funds from which the appropriations to the trust fund were made. The state is subrogated to a right of claim held by participants in the plan and annuity holders to the extent of amounts spent from the trust fund.

In this section,

“annuity holder” means

a plan participant who elects to receive an annuity contract acquired by the Department of Administration and issued by Executive Life Insurance Company of California; and

members of the Unlicensed Vessel Personnel Annuity Retirement Plan who receive an annuity contract acquired by the Department of Administration and issued by Executive Life Insurance Company of California;

“loss on investments” means

the difference between the principal amount plus accrued interest earned through May 3, 1991, on the guaranteed investment contracts issued by Executive Life Insurance Company of California, according to the terms of the contracts, and a lesser amount received by the plan upon maturity, sale, or other termination of the contracts; plus

accrued earnings on the amount described in (A) of this subsection, beginning May 4, 1991, and continuing until the earlier of a participant’s benefit commencement date or the maturity, sale, or other termination of the contracts, at a rate equal to the rate, less one percent to be used for the purposes of (b)(2) — (3) of this section, earned each month on the investment loss trust fund; or

any unpaid annuity amounts due to annuity holders under an annuity contract issued by Executive Life Insurance Company of California;

“plan” means the supplemental annuity plan established under AS

39.30.150

—

39.30.180

;

“trust fund” means the investment loss trust fund established under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 42 SLA 1991)

Cross references. —

For legislative purpose in enacting this section, see § 1, ch. 42, SLA 1991 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 42, SLA 1991 provides that “the Department of Revenue shall notify the lieutenant governor, the revisor of statutes, the commissioner of administration, and the legislative budget and audit committee when the investment loss trust fund is terminated” under (c) of this section.